Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3808
Entry upon land authorized.

The county board of a county
that has adopted a coordinated program for the management of black-tailed
prairie dogs under section 23-3803, or anyone authorized by the county board,
may enter upon property in the county for purposes of performing the duties
and exercising the powers under the Black-Tailed Prairie Dog Management Act
without being subject to any action for trespass or damages, including damages
for destruction of growing crops, if reasonable care is exercised and forty-eight
hours' written advance notice of entrance is provided to the property owner
or occupant.

Laws 2012, LB473, § 8.